Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1009.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 13, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-1650.07, to read: START_STATUTE15-1650.07. Charlie Kirk memorial plaza; requirements; civil penalties; annual report A. On or before March 1, 2028, each university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents shall designate and develop a prominent area on the university's main campus as the "Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza".  The plaza must be located in a highly visible and easily accessible location. A university may satisfy the requirements prescribed by this subsection by designating an area for the plaza that is located near the central quad, student union or main entrance pathways. B. The board shall adopt guidelines for the minimum size and configuration of each plaza that is required by subsection A of this section.  The guidelines must: 1. Include allowances for proportionally reduced dimensions based on campus acreage, student enrollment and available space. 2. Require each plaza to: (a) Meet the prominence and accessibility requirements prescribed by subsection A of this section. (b) Include permanent signage that commemorates Charlie Kirk's courage and faith and that explains the significance of Charlie Kirk as a voice of a generation, modern civil rights leader, vocal Christian, martyr for truth and faith and advocate for free speech. (c) Include as a central element of the plaza design a statue of either Charlie Kirk sitting at a table with an empty seat across from him or of Charlie Kirk and his wife standing and holding their children in their arms. C. On or before March 1, 2027, and before beginning construction on a plaza that will be designated and developed pursuant to subsection A of this section, a representative of the university shall submit a detailed plan to the chairpersons of the education committees of the house of representatives and the state senate, or their successor committees, for review.  Each plan must include a proposed location, size, design elements and a projected timeline for completion. D. The board may accept donations from any lawful source to fund the development, maintenance and enhancement of the plazas that are designated pursuant to this section, including the required statues. If the legislature appropriates monies to the board for the plazas required by this section, the board may allocate to each university a grant in an amount that does not exceed $750,000 for the costs of developing, maintaining and enhancing the university's plaza.  A private postsecondary educational institution that is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 30, article 2 and that has a physical campus in this state or a community college as defined in section 15-1401 may apply to the board for a grant to designate and develop a Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza on the institution's or community college's campuses that are located in this state.  If sufficient monies are available, the board shall award a grant to an institution or community college pursuant to this subsection on substantially the same terms as the board awards a grant to a university for a plaza that is a similar size and style. E. Each university, community college and private postsecondary educational institution that designates a plaza pursuant to this section: 1. Shall: (a) Implement appropriate security measures, including the installation of a security camera system or physical barriers, to ensure the plaza and statues are protected from vandalism and defacement. (b) Expel any student who defaces or vandalizes the plaza or statue. (c) Terminate the employment of any faculty member, contractor or other personnel who defaces or vandalizes the plaza or statue. (d) Ensure that the plaza is a neutral forum for protected speech. 2. Is entitled to monetary damages for the cost of repairing any damage caused by the defacement or vandalism of the plaza or statue. F. The board shall prescribe policies and procedures to enforce the requirements prescribed by subsection E of this section.  The policies and procedures prescribed pursuant to this subsection must prioritize the preservation of the plaza and statue. G. The board may adopt rules to implement this section. H. On or before March 1, 2027 and March 1 each year thereafter, the board shall submit a report to the speaker of the house of representatives, president of the senate and secretary of state that includes information about the implementation and statewide compliance with the requirements of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Implementation; civil penalties; delayed repeal A. If a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents fails to complete construction of the university's Charlie Kirk memorial plaza on or before March 1, 2028, the attorney general may impose a civil penalty against the university in an amount that does not exceed one percent of the university's budget for each month until the university complies with the requirements prescribed by this section. B. The legislature may waive the civil penalty authorized pursuant to subsection A of this section for any university that has started construction of the plaza on or before March 1, 2028. C. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2030. Sec. 3. Findings; intent A. The legislature finds and declares that: 1. Charlie Kirk, born on October 14, 1993, was tragically martyred by assassination on September 10, 2025. 2. Charlie was a fearless defender of free speech, the founder and chief executive officer of Turning Point USA, and a transformative force in empowering young Americans to engage in open, robust discourse on college campuses. B. It is the intent of the legislature that: 1. Universities and colleges in this state establish a dedicated plaza on each campus in honor of Charlie Kirk to perpetuate his legacy as a martyr for truth, faith and the First Amendment. 2. Each dedicated plaza be designated as a "Charlie Kirk Memorial Plaza" to remind all visitors to foster an environment of intellectual freedom, civic engagement and the principles that Charlie Kirk championed, thereby ensuring that future generations remember his courage, faith, sacrifice and contributions to American liberty. 2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona.